src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/V-T-A-ino_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  +ero+:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.+fst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.+fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - ino - ok : # -m animate transitive verb, see AEW NA1
     PS/ohkana+ino+VTA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kitohkanainookihpinnaana
     PS/ii+ino+VTA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO: nitsiinooka
     PS/a+PS/matt+ino+VTA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kitamattsinoo
     PS/a+ino+VTA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kitainooki
     PS/ii+ino+VTA+Ind+3Sg+4PlO: iinoyiiwa
     PS/akoksska+ino+VTA+Ind+Unspec+3SgO: akoksskainoawa
     PS/piitsiyoohk+ino+VTA+Ind+3Sg+4PlO: piitsiyoohksinoyiiwa
     PS/yaak+PS/kaak+PS/aahs+ino+VTA+Ind+Unspec+3SgO: aaksikakahsinoawa
     PS/a+ino+VTA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kitainoawa
     PS/a+ino+VTA+Ind+3Sg+4PlO: ainoyiiwa
     PS/iik+PS/ama+ino+VTA+Ind+3Sg+4PlO+PRO+D3Pl: iikamainoyiiwaiksi
     ino+VTA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO: nitsinooka
     ino+VTA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kitsinoo
     PS/ii+PS/istsa'+ino+VTA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nitsiistsai'noawa
     PS/kata'+ino+VTA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO+Interr: kikatai'nookaiksaawa
     PS/yaak+ino+VTA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kitaaksinoawa
     PS/ikkam+PS/a'p+ino+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+3PlO: [ ikkama'pinoainiki, kama'pinoainiki ]
     PS/a+ino+VTA+Der/Rflx+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [ nitainoohsspinnaana, nitainoohsspinnaan ]
     ino+VTA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kitsinoawa
     PS/yaak+ino+VTA+Ind+Unspec+3SgO: aaksinoawa
     PS/a+ino+VTA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kitainoo
     PS/a+ino+VTA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nitainoawa
     ino+VTA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kitsinoohpinnaana
     PS/ohkana+ino+VTA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kitohkanainoohpoaawa
     PS/ohkana+ino+VTA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kitohkanainoawaawa
     PS/a+ino+VTA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: nitainoannaana
